Utah statutes.
20A-11-510.   County political party financial reporting requirements -- Year-end summary report.

(1)  A county political party officer of a county political party that has received contributions totaling at least $750, or disbursed expenditures totaling at least $50, during a calendar year shall file a summary report by January 10 of the following year.

(2) (a)  Each summary report shall include the following information as of December 31 of the previous year:

(i)  the net balance of the last summary report, if any;

(ii)  a single figure equal to the total amount of receipts reported on all interim reports, if any, filed during the previous year;

(iii)  a single figure equal to the total amount of expenditures reported on all interim reports, if any, filed during the previous year;

(iv)  a detailed listing of each contribution and public service assistance received since the last summary report that has not been reported in detail on an interim report;

(v)  for each nonmonetary contribution, the fair market value of the contribution;

(vi)  a detailed listing of each expenditure made since the last summary report that has not been reported in detail on an interim report;

(vii)  for each nonmonetary expenditure, the fair market value of the expenditure; and

(viii)  a net balance for the year consisting of the net balance from the last summary report, if any, plus all receipts minus all expenditures.

(b) (i)  For all individual contributions or public service assistance of $50 or less, a single aggregate figure may be reported without separate detailed listings.

(ii)  Two or more contributions from the same source that have an aggregate total of more than $50 may not be reported in the aggregate, but shall be reported separately.

(c)  In preparing the report, all receipts and expenditures shall be reported as of December 31 of the previous year.

(3)  The county political party officer shall certify in the summary report that, to the best of the officer's knowledge, all receipts and all expenditures have been reported as of December 31 of the previous year and that there are no bills or obligations outstanding and unpaid except as set forth in that report.



Enacted by Chapter 396, 2011 General Session

